test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-С_В-существо_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - существо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: существо́
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: существо́
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: существа́
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: существе́
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: существу́
      существо+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: существо́м
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: существа́
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: существа́
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Anim: суще́ств
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: суще́ств
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: существа́х
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: существа́м
      существо+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: существа́ми
